District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Parkside Canopy Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 104a of the Urban Forest Preservation Act of 2002, effective July 1, 2016
(D.C. Law 21-133; D.C. Official Code § 8-651.04a), is amended by adding a new subsection (e)
to read as follows:
“(e) This section shall not apply to a Heritage Tree located in Lots 865, 866, 867, 868,
and 869 in Square 5056 for which the Zoning Commission has approved a planned unit
development prior to July 1, 2016; provided, that a fee calculated at the rate applicable for
special trees pursuant to section 104 shall be paid for each Heritage Tree removed from the
aforesaid lots.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2